src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON UVVA_IV_NO_ErrOrth_uvvot      !!≈ * **@CODE@** passives -uvvat, with no possible -uvvot derived from -it
! +V+IV:uvva%> BOAHTIINCH ; no actor
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:uvva»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:uvva»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
! +V+IV:uvva%> BOAHTICnj ; replaced bŧ individual pointers to avoid vajálduvvo:
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:uvva%> PrsV ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:uvva%> PrtV ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs:uvva%>Q7ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Cond:uvva%> CondV1 ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:uvva%> ImprtVA ;replaced bŧ individual pointers to avoid sorbmahuvvon:
 +V+IV+Imprt:uvva%>Q6 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs:Q6 ImprtSg2
 +V+IV+Imprt:uvva%> ImprtV2 ;
! +V+IV+Imprt+Sg1:uvva%>Q3n ENDLEX ;       ! bohton
 +V+IV+Imprt+Sg3:uvva%>Q3s 12pflag ;
 +V+IV+Imprt+Du2:uvvi 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +V+IV+Imprt+Du3:uvvoska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
! +V+IV+Imprt+Pl1:uvvot ENDLEX ;       to avoid vajálduvvot
 +V+IV+Imprt+Pl2+Err/Orth:uvvit 12pflag ;       ! boahttit
! +V+IV+Imprt+Pl1:Y3t ENDLEX ;      ! boahttut     ! This renders boahttet that are wrong
 +V+IV+Imprt+Pl2:uvvet 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
 +V+IV+Imprt+Pl3:uvvoset 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 +V+IV:uvva%>X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+IV:uvva%>X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +V+IV:uvva%>Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc:uvva%>X2n Kflag ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:uvva%>X2n K ;
! +V+IV+Use/NG+Use/-PLX:uvva%>Q3 NominalFormsV5 ; vajálduvvo
 +V+IV+Use/NG+Use/-PLX:uvva%>Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;

 +V+IV+Inf+Err/Orth-a-á:uvvát K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth-a-á:uvva K ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der2+Der/las+A+Use/-PLX:uvva»X2lass LAS ;
! +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N:uvva»m PRE_BOAHTIN ;
< "@P.Px.add@" 0:u 0:v 0:v "+V":a "+IV":%> "+Der4":» "+Der/NomAct":m "+N":0 > PRE_BOAHTIN ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-PLX:uvva»mušš MUSH ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/meahttun+A+Use/-PLX:uvva»W8meahttu MEAHTTUN ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/h+V+TV:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON SMUVVA_IV      !!≈ * **@CODE@** passives -smuvvat
 :m UVVA_IV ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/h+V+TV:»muhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON SNUVVA_IV      !!≈ * **@CODE@** passives -snuvvat
 :n UVVA_IV ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/h+V+TV:»nuhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;


LEXICON DOAROSTUVVA_TV      !!≈ * **@CODE@** INCHOATIVES on -stuvvat
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIINCH ;


LEXICON MAHTALADDA_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic Already derived words (except words ending -uššat) without Personal Passive but with Acc obj
 +V+TV:%> MAHTALADDAStem ;



!!!! 2c. impersonals
!    --------------------------------------------


LEXICON ARVI_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic Impersonal Verbs
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsARVI ;
 :%> ARVICnj ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ARVALADDA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Already derived words (except words ending -uššat)
 :%> ARVICnj ;





!!! 2d. lexicas tweaked (mostly) for speller reasons
!   ------------------------------------------


!!! These have no Der/NomAg, Equivalent "normal" lexicon is pointed out in the comment:
!   ----------------------------------


LEXICON MASSI_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons). Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive. Otherwise like VUOVDI_TV
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:%>»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VALDI_TV      !!≈ * **@CODE@**  No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons). Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive. No VGen. Otherwise like VUOVDI_TV
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:%>»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs:%> PrsV ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prt:%> PrtV ;
 +V+TV+Pot+Prs:%>Q7ž PotC ;
 +V+TV+Cond:%> CondV1 ;
 +V+TV+Imprt:%> ImprtVA ;
 +V+TV:%>X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+TV+Ger:%>X4dettiin K ;
 +V+TV+Ger+Err/Orth:%>X4dettin K ;
 +V+TV+Ger:%>X4dettiin%> PxC ;
 +V+TV+Ger+Use/NG:%>X4din K ;
 +V+TV+Ger+Use/NG:%>X4diin K ;
 +V+TV:%>X4 VABESS ;
 !+V+TV+VGen:%>X4 VGEN ;
 +V+TV+Use/NG:%>Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 +V+TV:%>X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +V+TV+Use/-Spell:%>Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +V+TV:%>Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
 +V+TV:%>X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ASTA_TV   !!≈ * **@CODE@** No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons). Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs with Personal Passive. Otherwise like BORRA_TV
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:%>»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;


LEXICON BORGI_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but without Der/NomAg. No Der/NomAg for speller reasons. Otherwise like BOAHTI_IV
 +V+IV:%> SG3PASSV ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;

LEXICON BEALLJA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** No Der/NomAg for speller reasons. Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but without Der/NomAg. Otherwise like DIEVVA_IV
 +V+IV:%> SG3PASSV ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;


LEXICON DAVGU_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  As DAHTU_TV, No Der/NomAg for speller reasons.
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;


LEXICON LEABBU_TV    !!≈ * **@CODE@** No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons)- otherwise like DEAKCU_TV
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV:%>»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOLTU ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;


LEXICON ALBMU_TV   !!≈ * **@CODE@** No Der/NomAg (for speller reasons). As BOLTU_TV otherwise
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOLTU ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+TV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;



LEXICON BARGU_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  no Der/NomAg for speller reasons- Like ALLU_IV
 +V+IV:%>Y7j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> RAIMMAHALLAINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;

LEXICON BORSU_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** as BINDU. No Der/NomAg
 +V+IV:%>Y7j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:%>»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:%>»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBINDU ;
 +V+TV:%> DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;


! The following ones are tweaked otherwise than the above ones
!   ------------------------------------------------------


LEXICON MUHTTI_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** No deverbal nouns an ACTIO(for speller reasons). Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> MUHTTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>Q4 ENDLEX ;
