src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
ajihuvvat:ajih UVVA_IV_NO_ErrOrth_uvvot ;
almmustuvvat:almmust UVVA_IV_NO_ErrOrth_uvvot ;
buođđut:buođđu ASTA_TV ;
bálkut:bálºku ALBMU_TV ;
bállit:bálli BORGI_IV ;
bárdit:bárºdi MASSI_TV ;
cápmit:cápmi MASSI_TV ;
darvit:darºvi BORGI_IV ;
deatnut:deatnu BEALLJA_IV ;
diškut:dišºku ALBMU_TV ;
doarrut:doarru ASTA_TV ;
dáhttut:dáhttu ALBMU_TV ;
dáhttut+Err/Orth-a-á:dahttu ALBMU_TV ;
dáigut:dájºgu BARGU_IV ;
feastit:feasºti MASSI_TV ;
fierrut:fierru LEABBU_TV ;
vierrut:vierru LEABBU_TV ;
geallit:gealli BORGI_IV ;
geardut:gearºdu LEABBU_TV ;
goargut:goarºgu BEALLJA_IV ;
gurput:gurºpu DAVGU_TV ;
gárrat:gárra ASTA_TV ;
jugastuvvat:jugastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
jurddašaddat:jurddašadda MAHTALADDA_TV ;
jurddašallat:jurddašalla MAHTALADDA_TV ;
jáhkestuvvat:jáhke7stuvva MAHTALADDA_TV ;
leabbut:leabbu LEABBU_TV ;
leahkkut:leahkku LEABBU_TV ;
loaggit:loaggi BORGI_IV ;
loaktit:loakºti MASSI_TV ;
láddat:ládda BEALLJA_IV ;
láhtut:láhºtu ALBMU_TV ;
mannut:mannu BARGU_IV ;
molsut:molºsu ALBMU_TV ;
máhttit:máhtti MAHTALADDA_TV ;
máhttit+Err/Orth-a-á:mahtti MAHTALADDA_TV ;
nievkat:nievºka ASTA_TV ;
nissut:nissu ALBMU_TV ;
njamastuvvat:njamastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
njuorasmuvvat:njuoras SMUVVA_IV ;
njuorasnuvvat:njuoras SNUVVA_IV ;
návdut:návºdu DAVGU_TV ;
rievvut:rievvu LEABBU_TV ;
riggat:rigga BEALLJA_IV ;
rihkkut:rihkku DAVGU_TV ;
ráhput:ráhºpu DAVGU_TV ;
rássat:rássa ASTA_TV ;
saddit:saddi MASSI_TV ;
seahtit:seahºti BORGI_IV ;
skeaŋkut:skeaŋºku LEABBU_TV ;
skuldut:skulºdu DAVGU_TV ;
suvrut:suvºru BARGU_IV ;
sárdnut:sárdnu ALBMU_TV ;
sárrat:sárra ASTA_TV ;
veahtit:veahºti MASSI_TV ;
virkkosmuvvat:virkkos SMUVVA_IV ;
virkkosnuvvat:virkkos SNUVVA_IV ;
váldit:válºdi VALDI_TV ;
váldit+Err/Orth-a-á:valºdi VALDI_TV ;
áidut:ájºdu DAVGU_TV ;
áigut+Err/Orth-a-á:ajºgu ALBMU_TV ;
ávžut:ávºžu DAVGU_TV ;
áššehuvvat:ášše7h UVVA_IV_NO_ErrOrth_uvvot ;
čielgat:čielºga BEALLJA_IV ;
šleaŋgut:šleaŋºgu LEABBU_TV ;
čálihuvvat:čálih UVVA_IV_NO_ErrOrth_uvvot ;
davrat:davºra ASTA_TV ;
girdnut:girdnu DAVGU_TV ;
muhttit:muhtti MUHTTI_TV ;
njalpit:njalºpi MASSI_TV ;
stáđásmuvvat+Err/Orth-a-á:stáđas SMUVVA_IV ;
stáđásnuvvat+Err/Orth-a-á:stáđas SNUVVA_IV ;
limškut:limšºku BARGU_IV ;
hujusmuvvat:hujus SMUVVA_IV ;
hujusnuvvat:hujus SNUVVA_IV ;
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
asásmuvvat:asás SMUVVA_IV ;
bahtit:bahºti BORGI_IV ;
bajánastit:bajánasºti ARVALADDA_IV ;
bihkkaduvvat:bihkkad UVVA_IV_NO_ErrOrth_uvvot ;
bivaldallat:bivaldalla ARVALADDA_IV ;
boahkkut:boahkku BEALLJA_IV ;
boršut:borºšu BORSU_IV ;
buitit:bujºti MASSI_TV ;
buldut:bulºdu BARGU_IV ;
bálggádahttit:bálggádahtti ARVALADDA_IV ;
ceavvut:ceavvu ARVI_IV ;
dohkasmuvvat:dohkas SMUVVA_IV ;
dohkasnuvvat:dohkas SNUVVA_IV ;
duolmmastuvvat:duolmmastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
dáhtostuvvat:dáhto7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
dálkat:dálºka ARVI_IV ;
dálvvádahttit:dálvvádahtti ARVALADDA_IV ;
earbmut:earbmu ARVI_IV ;
geavlit:geavºli BORGI_IV ;
gieggat:giegga ASTA_TV ;
gierddastuvvat:gierddastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
givdnjut:givdnju BARGU_IV ;
giđđaluvvat:giđđaluvva ARVALADDA_IV ;
gulastuvvat:gulastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
healsut:healºsu LEABBU_TV ;
hieibmat:hiejbma ARVI_IV ;
ittásmuvvat:ittás SMUVVA_IV ;
ittásnuvvat:ittás SNUVVA_IV ;
jaggit:jaggi BORGI_IV ;
jiellut:jiellu BEALLJA_IV ;
joavgat:joavºga ARVI_IV ;
jáhkahaddat:jáhkahadda MAHTALADDA_TV ;
jáhkahallat:jáhkahalla MAHTALADDA_TV ;
loahkáhallat:loahkáhalla ARVALADDA_IV ;
loškit:lošºki BORGI_IV ;
luoittestuvvat:luoitte7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
muohttit:muohtti ARVI_IV ;
navggasmuvvat:navggas SMUVVA_IV ;
navggasnuvvat:navggas SNUVVA_IV ;
njuoggut:njuoggu BEALLJA_IV ;
njáigut:njájºgu BARGU_IV ;
nuorástahttit:nuorástahtti ARVALADDA_IV ;
ružžut:ružžu BARGU_IV ;
ráikut:rájºku DAVGU_TV ;
seallat:sealla ASTA_TV ;
siđasmuvvat:siđas SMUVVA_IV ;
siđasnuvvat:siđas SNUVVA_IV ;
skálvat:skálºva ARVI_IV ;
spiellat:spiella ARVI_IV ;
vuorrat:vuorra BEALLJA_IV ;
vánttasmuvvat:vánttas SMUVVA_IV ;
vánttasnuvvat:vánttas SNUVVA_IV ;
áddestuvvat:áddestuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
áinnádastit:áinnádasºti ARVALADDA_IV ;
čavččaiduvvat:čavččaiduvva ARVALADDA_IV ;
čierostuvvat:čiero7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
šlahttit:šlahtti ARVI_IV ;
šlubbut:šlubbu BARGU_IV ;
čoallit+Err/Lex:čoalli MASSI_TV ; !what is this?
